Washington statutes.
RCW 2.04.250

Judge pro tempore—Remuneration.

(1) A judge of the court of appeals or of the superior court serving as a judge pro tempore of the supreme court as provided in RCW 2.04.240 shall receive, in addition to his or her regular salary, reimbursement for subsistence, lodging, and travel expenses in accordance with the rates applicable to state officers under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(2) A retired judge of a court of record in this state serving as a judge pro tempore of the supreme court as provided in RCW 2.04.240 shall receive, in addition to any retirement pay he or she may be receiving, the following compensation and expenses:

(a) Reimbursement for subsistence, lodging, and travel expenses in accordance with the rates applicable to state officers under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(b) During the period of his or her service as a judge pro tempore, an amount equal to the salary of a regularly elected judge of the court in which he or she last served for such period diminished by the amount of retirement pay accrued to him or her for such period.

(3) Whenever a superior court judge is appointed to serve as judge pro tempore of the supreme court and a visiting judge is assigned to replace him or her, subsistence, lodging, and travel expenses incurred by such visiting judge as a result of such assignment shall be paid in accordance with the rates applicable to state officers under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, upon application of such judge from the appropriation of the supreme court.

(4) A justice appointed as judge pro tempore of the supreme court under RCW 2.04.240(2) shall continue to receive compensation in accordance with the rates applicable to the justice immediately before the expiration of the term.

(5) The provisions of RCW 2.04.240(1) and 2.04.250 (1) through (3) shall not be construed as impairing or enlarging any right or privilege acquired in any retirement or pension system by any judge or his or her dependents.

[ 1997 c 88 s 2; 1982 c 72 s 2; 1981 c 186 s 1; 1963 c 40 s 2.]